Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 44 Renal Disease Facilities

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 and the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 1194, § 1/SB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the general intent of this Act to eliminate the future ‘sunset’ of certain provisions relating to renal dialysis facilities.
The following provisions of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated which were in effect and applicable on January 1, 2005, shall remain in effect and applicable until and unless changed by future Act of the General Assembly:

“(1) Code Section 31-44-1, relating to definitions;

“(2) Code Section 31-44-2, relating to fees;

“(3) Code Section 31-44-3, relating to adoption of rules and the establishment of the Renal Dialysis Advisory Council;

“(4) Code Section 31-44-4, relating to license requirement;

“(5) Code Section 31-44-5, relating to exceptions to licensing requirements;

“(6) Code Section 31-44-6, relating to application for license; fee; evidence of qualified staff; temporary provisional license; issuance of license; and renewability of license;

“(7) Code Section 31-44-7, relating to minimum standards of rules;

“(8) Code Section 31-44-8, relating to qualifications of employees;

“(9) Code Section 31-44-9, relating to minimum standards for curricula, instructors, and training;

“(10) Code Section 31-44-10, relating to inspections;

“(11) Code Section 31-44-11, relating to authority of department to deal with violations of Chapter 44 of Title 31 or rules adopted thereunder;

“(12) Code Section 31-44-12, relating to deposit of collected penalties;

“(13) Code Section 31-44-13, relating to temporary management of facilities;

“(14) Code Section 31-44-14, relating to action to enjoin operation of facility; and

“(15) Code Section 31-44-15, relating to fee of temporary manager.

“(b) The following provision of law is repealed:

“Section 4 of an Act amending Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, approved April 20, 2000 (Ga. L. 2000, p. 526), which now repealed section would have provided for a future repeal or sunset of certain provisions relating to renal dialysis facilities.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

End stage renal disease facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-22.

31-44-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Health.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Dialysis” means a process by which dissolved substances are removed from a patient’s body by diffusion, osmosis, and convection (ultrafiltration) from one fluid compartment to another across a semipermeable membrane.

“Dialysis technician” means an individual who is not a registered nurse or physician and who provides dialysis care under the supervision of a registered nurse or physician.

“End stage renal disease” means that stage of renal impairment that appears irreversible and permanent and that requires a regular course of dialysis or kidney transplantation to maintain life.

“End stage renal disease facility” means a facility that provides dialysis treatment, home dialysis training, support services, or any combination thereof to individuals with end stage renal disease.

“Physician” means an individual who is licensed to practice medicine under Article 2 of Chapter 34 of Title 34.

“Reuse technician” means an individual who is not a registered nurse or licensed physician who performs the procedures necessary to clean and properly prepare kidney dialyzers for use for multiple treatments.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-18/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “semipermeable” was substituted for “semi-permeable” in paragraph (1) (now paragraph (3)).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 05.12.20.02.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-44-2.
Fees.

The board shall set fees imposed by this chapter in amounts reasonable and necessary to defray the costs of administering this chapter with due consideration to the amount of funds received from the federal government by the department for performance of medicare certification surveys of dialysis clinics. In setting fees under this Code section, the board shall consider setting a range of license and renewal fees based upon the number of dialysis stations at each facility, but in no event shall the annual license fee exceed $1,500.00 per end stage renal disease facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The
chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-3.
Adoption of rules.

The board shall adopt rules to implement this chapter, including but not limited to requirements for the issuance, renewal, denial, suspension, and revocation of a license to operate an end stage renal disease facility. The rules adopted by the board pursuant to this Code section shall not conflict with any federal law or regulation applicable to end stage renal disease facilities or personnel thereof and shall set forth minimum standards for the health, safety, and protection of the patient being served.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1194, § 2/SB 48; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-15/HB 186; Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 11-1/HB 553; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 31/SB 429.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (d). The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, deleted the subsection (a) designation; deleted former subsection (b), which read: “The department shall establish a Renal Dialysis Advisory Council to advise the department regarding licensing and inspection of end stage renal disease facilities. The council shall be composed of a minimum of 13 persons appointed by the board: one member recommended by the Dogwood Chapter of the American Nephrology Nurses Association; one member recommended by the Georgia Association of Kidney Patients; two physicians specializing in nephrology recommended by the Georgia Renal Physicians Association; one member recommended by the National Kidney Foundation of Georgia; two administrators of facilities certified as outpatient dialysis facilities in Georgia; three members of the general public, two of whom shall be dialysis patients or family members of dialysis patients; one member representing technicians working in renal dialysis facilities; one member representing social workers working in renal dialysis facilities; and one member representing dietitians working in renal dialysis facilities.”; and deleted former subsection (c), which read: “Members of the council shall serve four-year terms and until their successors are appointed and qualified. No member of the council shall serve more than two consecutive terms. The council shall meet as frequently as the department considers necessary, but not less than twice each year. The council shall be consulted and have the opportunity to evaluate all rules promulgated by the department under this chapter applicable to end stage renal disease facilities prior to their adoption. Members shall serve without compensation.” See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted the subsection (a) designation and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “The council shall submit an annual report no later than October 1 of its recommendations and evaluation of its implementation to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination.”

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, subsection (d) as enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-15/HB 186 was redesignated as subsection (b) due to the deletion of former subsections (b) and (c) by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 11-1/HB 553.
Additionally, the deletion of the subsection (a) designation by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 11-1/HB 553 was not implemented.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 11-2/HB 553, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any assets of the Renal Dialysis Advisory Council existing as of June 30, 2019, shall devolve by operation of law and without further action to the State of Georgia on July 1, 2019.
Any liabilities and obligations of the Renal Dialysis Advisory Council existing as of June 30, 2019, shall be transferred to and assumed by the State of Georgia, by such instruments as may be required to maintain the same.”

31-44-4.
License required.

Except as provided by Code Section 31-44-5, no person, business entity, corporation, or association may operate an end stage renal disease facility without a license issued under this chapter. Any end stage renal disease facility which is in operation when this chapter becomes effective for all purposes, and which has been certified for participation in the federal medicare program shall be granted a license by the department upon payment of the applicable license fee. A license shall be effective for a 12 month period following the date of issue and shall expire one year following such date; provided, however, a facility that has not been inspected during the year may continue to operate under its existing license until an inspection is made.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “31-44-5” was substituted for “31-43-5” in the first sentence of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-5.
Exceptions to licensing requirement.

The following facilities are not required to be licensed under this chapter:

A hospital permitted under Chapter 7 of this title that provides dialysis to individuals receiving services from the hospital;

The office of a physician unless the office is used primarily as an end stage renal disease facility; or

Federal or state agency facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s note at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-6.
Application for license; fee; evidence of qualified staff; temporary provisional license; issuance of license; renewability of license.

An applicant for a license under this chapter must submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department.

Each application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable $100.00 application fee.

Each application must contain evidence that there are sufficient qualified staff at the facility.

The department may grant a temporary provisional license to an applicant.

The department shall issue a license if it finds the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

The license is renewable periodically after submission of:

The renewal application and fee; and

Satisfactory compliance with the rules adopted under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-7.
Minimum standards of rules.

The rules adopted under Code Section 31-44-3 must contain minimum standards to protect the health and safety of a patient of an end stage renal disease facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “31-44-3” was substituted for “31-43-3” in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-8.
Qualifications of employees.

An end stage renal disease facility may not employ or have working in that facility as a dialysis or reuse technician anyone other than an individual trained and competent pursuant to the rules promulgated under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-9.
Minimum standards for curricula, instructors, and training.

The rules adopted by the board under Code Section 31-44-3 shall establish:

Minimum standards for the curricula and instructors used to train individuals to act as dialysis or reuse technicians;

Minimum standards for the determination of the competency of individuals who have been trained as dialysis or reuse technicians;

Minimum requirements for documentation that an individual has been trained and determined to be competent as a dialysis or reuse technician and the acceptance of that documentation by another end stage renal disease facility that may later employ the individual; and

The acts and practices that are allowed or prohibited for dialysis or reuse technicians.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “31-44-3” was substituted for “31-43-3” in the introductory language.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-10.
Inspections.

The department shall conduct periodic inspections of each end stage renal disease facility to verify compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

An inspection conducted under this Code section shall be unannounced, except for initial inspections, location changes, or expansions.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549 § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-11.
Authority of department to deal with violations of this chapter or rules adopted thereunder.

The department is authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this chapter for a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter, or take other disciplinary actions against licensees as provided in Code Section 31-2-8.

The denial, suspension, or revocation of a license by the department shall be a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-44-12.
Deposit of collected penalties.

A civil or administrative penalty collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury to the general fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-13.
Temporary management of facilities.

A person holding a controlling interest in an end stage renal disease facility may, at any time, request the department to assume the management of the facility through the appointment of a temporary manager under this chapter.

After receiving the request, the department may enter into an agreement providing for the appointment of a temporary manager to manage the facility under conditions considered appropriate by both parties if the department considers the appointment desirable.

An agreement under this Code section must:

Specify all terms and conditions of the temporary manager’s appointment and authority; and

Preserve all rights granted by law of the individuals served by the facility.

The primary duty of the temporary manager is to ensure that adequate and safe services are provided to patients until temporary management ceases.

The appointment terminates at the time specified by the agreement.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Code” was inserted in the introductory language of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-14.
Action to enjoin operation of facility.

The department may request that the Attorney General bring an action to enjoin either the continued operation of the facility or the closing of the facility in the superior court of the county in which an end stage renal disease facility is located in the name of and on behalf of the state or for the appointment of a temporary manager to manage that end stage renal disease facility if:

The facility is operating without a license;

The department has denied, suspended, or revoked the facility’s license, but the facility continues to operate;

License denial, suspension, or revocation proceedings against the facility are pending and the department determines that an imminent or reasonably foreseeable threat to the health and safety of a patient of the facility exists;

The department determines that an emergency exists that presents an immediate threat to the health and safety of a patient of the facility; or

The facility is closing and arrangements for the care of patients by other licensed facilities have not been made before closure.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.

31-44-15.
Fee of temporary manager.

A temporary manager appointed under Code Section 31-44-13 or 31-44-14 is entitled to a reasonable fee as determined by the court. The fee shall be paid by the facility.

A temporary manager appointed under Code Section 31-44-13 may petition the court to order the release to such manager of any payment owed such manager for care and services provided to patients of the facility if the payment has been withheld.

Withheld payments that may be released under subsection (b) of this Code section may include payments withheld by a governmental agency or other entity before or during the appointment of the temporary manager, including:

Medicaid, medicare, or insurance payments; or

Payments from another third party.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-44-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1, Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1, and Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 all enacted a Chapter 43 of Title 31. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 1 has been redesignated as Chapter 44 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly. The chapter enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 549, § 3 has been redesignated as Chapter 45 of Title 31 and the Code sections therein redesignated accordingly.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “31-44-13 or 31-44-14” was substituted for “31-43-13 or 31-43-14” in subsection (a) and “31-44-13” was substituted for “31-43-13” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the elimination of a certain future repeal or “sunset” of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter.